Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2117.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.20
THE PERSONAL HYGIENE PRODUCT SAFETY AND TOXIC METAL REMOVAL ACT
OF 2026
23-18.20-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Personal Hygiene Product Safety
and Toxic Metal Removal Act of 2026”.
23-18.20-2. Legislative purpose.
It is the purpose of this chapter to protect public health by reducing consumer exposure to
toxic metals, including lead, cadmium, arsenic, and other harmful substances, through the
regulation of personal hygiene and care products. This chapter seeks to eliminate detectable
concentrations of these toxic metals in personal care items, ensuring their safety for public use.
23-18.20-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings
unless the context shall clearly indicate another or different meaning or intent:
(1) “Detectable concentration” means any presence of a toxic metal at or above the
threshold levels set forth in § 23-18.20-4, measured by the standards of the U.S. Food and Drug

Administration (FDA) or other applicable regulatory bodies.
(2) “Personal hygiene and care product” means any product intended for personal
cleansing, and grooming including, but not limited to, cosmetics, tampons and pads.
(3) “Toxic metal” means any metal identified as hazardous to human health by the
Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) or other recognized health authorities including, but not
limited to, lead, cadmium, and arsenic.
23-18.20-4. Prohibition of toxic metal in personal hygiene products.
No personal hygiene or care product sold in this state shall contain detectable
concentrations of any toxic metals including, but not limited to, lead, cadmium, or arsenic above
the following limits:
(1) Lead: 0.1 parts per million (ppm);
(2) Cadmium: 0.05 ppm;
(3) Arsenic: 0.1 ppm; and
(4) For metals not listed in this chapter but deemed harmful by relevant authorities, the
United States Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) shall determine appropriate
concentration limits based on scientific studies and public health risks.
23-18.20-5. Testing and monitoring.
Manufacturers of personal hygiene and care products sold in this state shall be required to
regularly test and document the presence of toxic metals in their products. The testing shall be
conducted by independent laboratories accredited by the FDA or an equivalent authority.
23-18.20-6. Reporting requirements.
All manufacturers shall submit reports to the department of business regulation (DBR)
detailing the results of product testing, including proof that their products meet the limits
established pursuant to this chapter. Reports shall be made available to the public via the
department’s website.
23-18.20-7. Enforcement and penalties.
(a) The DBR or its designated agents shall have the authority to inspect, seize, and test
personal hygiene products suspected of containing harmful levels of toxic metals. Products found
to be in violation of the concentration limits set forth § 23-18.20-4 shall be subject to recall at the
manufacturer’s expense.
(b) Manufacturers found in violation of this chapter shall be subject to civil penalties up to
two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per violation. Repeat offenders may face increased
penalties including, but not limited to, possible suspension of their license to conduct business in
this state.
LC003909 - Page 2 of 4

(c) The DBR shall have the authority to obtain an injunction or seek other legal relief to
prohibit the sale of personal care products violating the concentration limits set forth in this chapter.
23-18.20-8. Public awareness and education.
(a) Personal hygiene products shall include a label that certifies they have been tested and
meet all federal safety standards concerning toxic metals.
(b) The executive office of health and human services shall implement an educational
campaign to inform consumers about the risks of toxic metals in personal care products, the
importance of reading product labels, and the steps being taken to protect public health.
23-18.20-9. Research and development funding.
The executive office of health and human services shall provide grants to academic
institutions, nonprofit organizations, and industry stakeholders for the research and development
of safer alternatives to toxic metals in personal hygiene and care products.
23-18.20-10. Appropriations.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary for
the expenses of administering and implementation of this chapter.
23-18.20-11. Severability.
If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any
court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate
the remainder of the chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph,
section, or part directly involved in the controversy in which that judgment shall have been
rendered.
23-18.20-12. Effective date.
This chapter shall take effect on January 1, 2030, with manufacturers being required to
comply with the concentration limits set forth in § 23-18.20-4 within one hundred eighty (180) days
thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003909
========
LC003909 - Page 3 of 4